Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.15.300

Termination—Grounds.

The secretary of state may terminate the registration of a registered foreign corporation under the circumstances and procedures specified in RCW 23.95.550.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2141; 1991 c 72 s 39; 1990 c 178 s 9; 1989 c 165 s 180.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Effective date—1990 c 178: See note following RCW 23B.01.220.